Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 11. Wyoming Community College Endowment Challenge Program

Cross references. —

As to community colleges generally, see chapter 18 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 1, and Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1, both enacted an article 10 in chapter 16 of this title. The provisions enacted by Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1, were redesignated as article 11 (§§

21-16-1101

through

21-16-1104

) by the legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 21-16-1101.
Wyoming community college endowment challenge program.

The Wyoming community college endowment challenge program is created.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1.

§ 21-16-1102.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Challenge fund” means the community college endowment challenge fund created under this article;

“Endowment gift” means an irrevocable gift or transfer to a Wyoming community college foundation of money or other property, whether real, personal, tangible or intangible, and whether or not the donor or transferor retains an interest in the property, where the gift or the foundation’s interest in the property is required to be used by the foundation exclusively for endowment purposes, where:

The gift was received or the transfer occurred on or after July 1, 2004; or

A commitment to make the gift or transfer was made in writing to the respective community college foundation, which commitment was received on or after July 1, 2004, and the gift was received or the transfer occurred not later than December 31 of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made.

“Foundation” means an organization established for each community college that among other purposes, exists to generate additional revenues for community college programs and activities;

“Permanent endowment funds managed by a Wyoming community college foundation” means the endowment funds that are invested by the respective Wyoming community college foundation on a permanent basis and the earnings on those investments are dedicated to be expended exclusively to benefit and promote the mission, operation or any program or activity of the respective community college, including but not limited to professorships and student scholarships, increases to the corpus of the endowment and defraying reasonable costs of endowment administration.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “on or after July 1, 2004” for “during the period July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2009” in (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B); and substituted “of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made” for “2010” in (a)(2)(B).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-1103.
Wyoming community college endowment challenge fund.

The Wyoming community college endowment challenge fund is created and shall consist of seven (7) separate accounts, one (1) account for each Wyoming community college.

The state treasurer shall invest funds within the fund created under subsection (a) of this section and shall deposit the earnings from fund investments to the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) or

9-4-207

, other funds within the fund shall not lapse or revert until directed by the legislature and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of (b).

§ 21-16-1104.
Endowment challenge fund matching program; matching payments; agreements with foundations; annual reports.

To the extent funds are available in the separate account of any community college within the endowment challenge fund, the state treasurer shall match endowment gifts actually received by that community college’s foundation. Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, a match shall be paid under this subsection by the state treasurer at the time any accumulated amounts actually received by a community college foundation total ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) or more. Matching funds shall only be available for expenditure to the extent cash or cash equivalent contributions are actually received by the community college. Endowment gifts actually received by a community college foundation may also be accumulated until such time as state matching funds become available. The match shall be made by transferring from the separate challenge fund account to the appropriate community college an amount equal to the amount accumulated by its foundation. The recipient community college shall immediately transfer matching funds received under this subsection to the community college foundation.

Each community college district shall enter into an agreement with its foundation under which the foundation shall manage the matching funds received under subsection (a) of this section in the same manner as other permanent endowment funds are managed by its foundation, including the permanent investment of funds, maintenance of the fund corpus as inviolate and the expenditure of fund earnings for endowment purposes only.

Earnings from endowment funds established with matching funds under this section shall be expended only for the purpose of the endowment, including increasing the balance in the fund corpus and reasonable costs of administration.

Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, to the extent funds are available to the separate account of any community college, the state treasurer shall make transfers to the appropriate community college under this section not later than the end of the calendar quarter following the quarter during which foundation gifts total at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). Prior to the receipt of any substantial endowment gift, the donor shall be notified by the foundation that there may or may not be any state matching funds available for the gift. If funds are not available for any community college account, the amount of gifts to that foundation may be accumulated until such time as matching funds become available. Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, if gifts are made through a series of payments or transfers, no matching funds shall be transferred under this section until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received totals at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).

Except as provided under subsection (f) of this section, matching funds paid under this section shall not be distributed to or encumbered by any community college foundation in excess of the amount in the challenge fund account for that college. Except to the extent authorized under subsection (f) of this section, matching funds shall not be transferred to any community college by the state treasurer except to match gifts actually received by its foundation.

Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, matching funds may be distributed to or encumbered by a community college foundation in excess of the amount within the challenge fund account of that college if:

Endowment gifts for that college exceed the amount within its challenge fund account;

The college enters into a written agreement with another college having unencumbered amounts remaining within its challenge fund account;

The college with unencumbered amounts within its account agrees to transfer any portion of its unencumbered amount to that college;

Matching funds transferred by the state treasurer for amounts transferred between colleges pursuant to this subsection shall be divided equally between the colleges participating in the agreement.

If the president of any community college determines that the purpose of an endowment gift to the community college’s foundation is not consistent with the mission or capability of that college, the gift shall not qualify for matching funds under this section.

For the purpose of computing the matching amount, the state treasurer shall use the value of an endowment gift based upon its fair market value at the time the gift is received by the community college foundation. The community college shall provide evidence of fair market value for any gift if requested by the state treasurer and shall fund the cost of providing any requested evidence.

Each community college shall on or before October 1 of each year submit a report from its foundation to the state treasurer and the community college commission on the endowment matching program under this section for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a financial summary and a review of the accomplishments resulting from endowment program expenditures.

To the extent funds are available in the separate account of any community college within the endowment challenge fund, the state treasurer shall distribute matching funds not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each fallen heroes endowment as follows:

Two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for the first one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) actually received in a fallen heroes endowment; and

Three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) for an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) actually received in a fallen heroes endowment, excluding any funds deposited in a fallen heroes endowment pursuant to this paragraph.

Nothing in this section obligates the legislature to match accumulated endowment gifts authorized under this section. The legislature reserves the right to modify or terminate the matching program at any time.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 84, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1; ch. 209, § 1; 2010, ch. 28, § 1; 2017 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “a report from its foundation to the state treasurer and the community college commission” for “a report to the state treasurer from its foundation” in (j).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, deleted the former last sentence of (j) which read: “The report required under this subsection shall be for each applicable fiscal year through June 30, 2011.”

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 1, inserted “Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section” at the beginning of the second sentence in (a) and at the beginning of both sentences in (d); and added (k).

Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted the present third sentence in (a); in (d), inserted “to the extent funds are available to the separate account of any community college” and the present second and third sentences; and added (m).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (a), inserted “Matching funds shall only be available for expenditure to the extent cash or cash equivalent contributions are actually received by the community college.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 209, § 2 provides: “It is the intent of the legislature that any matching funds provided under this act shall be used to initiate funding for any fallen heroes endowments at the community colleges in this state and the University of Wyoming. Any additional funding beyond the amount provided for in this act for any fallen heroes endowment shall be the responsibility of the appropriate community college or the University of Wyoming.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 2, appropriates $31,500,000 from the general fund to the community college endowment challenge fund. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any unexpended funds from the amount appropriated will revert to the budget reserve account on July 1, 2011. The amount appropriated into the challenge fund shall be equally deposited into each of the seven separate accounts created within the fund.